lt-LT: Gitaros stygų apvijos tipas: Su danga (apvyniotos); Plokščios apvijos („Flatwound“); Šlifuotos apvijos („Groundwound“); Pusapvalės apvijos („Halfround“); Spaustos apvijos („Pressurewound“); Apvalios apvijos („Roundwound“); Juostinės apvijos („Tapewound“); Be apvijos / paprastos; Kita
de: Wicklungsart der Gitarrensaiten: Beschichtet (umwickelt); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Nicht umwickelt/Blank; Sonstige
nb: Gitarstyrkeviklingstype: Belagt (omspunnet); Flatspunnet; Slipt spunnet; Halvrund; Trykkspunnet; Rundspunnet; Teipspunnet; Uspunnet/blank; Annet
hr-HR: Tip namotavanja gitare niz: Obložene (omotane); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Neomotane (plain); Ostalo
ru: Тип обмотки гитарных струн: С покрытием (с обмоткой); С плоской обмоткой; С полукруглой обмоткой; Со шлифованной обмоткой; С прессованной обмоткой; С круглой обмоткой; С ленточной обмоткой; Без обмотки / сплошная; Другое
sv: Gitarrstränglindningstyp: Belagd (omspunnen); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Oomspunnen/slät; Övrigt
pt-BR: Guitarra corda enrolamento tipo: Revestida (com enrolamento); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Sem enrolamento/lisa; Outra
th: ประเภทการพันสายกีตาร์: เคลือบ (พันเกลียว); แฟลตวาวด์; กราวด์วาวด์; ฮาล์ฟราวด์; เพรสเชอร์วาวด์; ราวด์วาวด์; เทปวาวด์; ไม่พันเกลียว/เรียบ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип намотка на китарните струни: С покритие (с намотка); Плоска намотка; Шлифована намотка; Полукръгла намотка; Пресована намотка; Кръгла намотка; Лентова намотка; Без намотка/гладки; Други
es: Tipo de entorchado de las cuerdas de guitarra: Revestido (entorchado); Entorchado plano; Entorchado pulido; Semiesférico; Entorchado a presión; Entorchado redondo; Entorchado con cinta; Sin entorchar/liso; Otro
nl: Gitaarsnaar wikkeling type: Gecoat (omwonden); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Niet omwonden/glad; Overig
vi: Kiểu quấn dây đàn guitar: Có phủ (dây bọc); Bọc dẹt; Bọc mài; Bọc bán tròn; Bọc nén; Bọc tròn; Bọc băng; Không bọc/trơn; Khác
fr: Type de filet des cordes de guitare: Enduit (filé); Filé plat; Filé meulé; Demi-rond; Filé compressé; Filé rond; Filé ruban; Non filé/lisse; Autre
ja: ギターストリング巻きタイプ: コーティング (ワウンド); フラットワウンド; グラウンドワウンド; ハーフラウンド; プレッシャーワウンド; ラウンドワウンド; テープワウンド; アンワウンド/プレーン; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de enrolamento de corrente de guitarra: Com revestimento (enrolada); Enrolamento liso; Enrolamento semiliso; Enrolamento meia-cana; Enrolamento sob pressão; Enrolamento redondo; Enrolamento em fita; Sem enrolamento/lisas; Outro
sk-SK: Typ vinutia gitarových strún: Potiahnuté (vinuté); S plochým vinutím (flatwound); Brúsené vinutie (groundwound); Polookrúhle vinutie (halfround); Tlakovo vinuté (pressurewound); S kruhovým vinutím (roundwound); Páskové vinutie (tapewound); Nevynuté/hladké; Iné
el: Τύπος περιέλιξης χορδών κιθάρας: Με επίστρωση (wound); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Unwound/plain; Άλλο
zh-CN: 吉他琴弦绕线类型: 涂层（缠绕）; 平卷; 磨弦; 半圆卷; 压卷; 圆卷; 缠带; 裸弦/光弦; 其他
hu: A gitárhúrok tekercselési típusa: Bevonatos (tekercselt); Lapos tekercselésű (Flatwound); Csiszolt tekercselésű; Félkereken tekercselt; Nyomással tekercselt; Kerek tekercselésű; Szalaggal tekercselt; Tekercseletlen/sima; Egyéb
ko: 기타 스트링 감는 타입: 코팅(와운드); 플랫와운드; 그라운드와운드; 하프라운드; 프레셔와운드; 라운드와운드; 테이프와운드; 언와운드/플레인; 기타
tr: Gitar tel sarım tipi: Kaplamalı (sargılı); Düz sargılı; Taşlanmış sargılı; Yarım yuvarlak sargılı; Basınç sargılı; Yuvarlak sargılı; Bant sargılı; Sargısız/düz; Diğer
pl: Typ owijki strun gitarowych: Powlekane (z owijką); Z płaską owijką; Z owijką szlifowaną; Z półokrągłą owijką; Z owijką sprasowaną; Z okrągłą owijką; Z owijką taśmową; Bez owijki / gładkie; Inne
ro-RO: Tipul de înfășurare a chitarei și a firului: Acoperite (înfășurate); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Neînfășurate/Simple; Altele
zh-TW: 吉他弦纏繞類型: 有塗層 (纏弦); 平捲弦; 半平捲弦; 半圓捲弦; 壓捲弦; 圓捲弦; 膠帶捲弦; 裸弦/光弦; 其他
it: Tipo di avvolgimento delle corde per chitarra: Con rivestimento (avvolto); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Non avvolto/liscio; Altro
cs: Typ vinutí kytarové struny: Potažené (vinuté); Ploché vinutí; Broušené vinutí; Poloploché vinutí; Tlakové vinutí; Válcové vinutí; Páskové vinutí; Bez vinutí / hladké; Jiné
en: Guitar string winding type: Coated (wound); Flatwound; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Unwound/plain; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta navijanja kitarskih strun: Premazane (ovite); Z ravnim ovojem (Flatwound); Brušeno ovite (Groundwound); Polokroglo ovite (Halfround); Tlačno ovite (Pressurewound); Okroglo ovite (Roundwound); Ovite s trakom (Tapewound); Neovite/gladke; Drugo
fi: Kitaran kielten viritystyyppi: Päällystetty (punottu); Sileäpunottu; Hiomapunottu; Puolipyöreä; Painepunottu; Pyöreäpunottu; Teippipunottu; Punomaton/sileä; Muu
da: Type af omspinding på guitarstrenge: Belagt (spundet); Fladspundet; Groundwound; Halfround; Pressurewound; Rundspundet; Tapespundet; Uspundet/glat; Andet